Louisiana, session 2026, SB146.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 43:141(A), 141, 143, 143.1(B)(1), and 144 are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 43:140(6) and 171(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§140. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed
to them in this Section:
* * *
(6) "Website" shall mean a Uniform Resource Locator ("URL"), or
unique online web address, used to locate and access resources on the internet,
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-401 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 146
which complies with the requirement of R.S. 43:141.1(A) and meets all of the
following requirements:
(a) Is the primary internet website owned or operated by or on behalf of
the governing body choosing to designate a website as its official journal.
(b) Is publicly accessible at no cost to users and without requiring
registration or login.
(c) Includes a dedicated section for legal notices, advertisements,
proclamations, minutes, ordinances, resolutions, budgets and other official
proceedings, clearly labeled and easily navigable from the homepage.
(d) Maintains an archive of all published notices for at least one year
from the date of posting, with searchable functionality by date, keyword, and
type of notice.
(e) Ensures that notices are posted in a timely manner as required by law
and remain unaltered once posted, except for corrections clearly noted.
(f) Complies with accessibility standards under the Americans with
Disabilities Act and provide a mechanism for users to request alterative
formats.
(g) Identifies a person, and that person's contact information,
responsible for receiving and publishing information required by law to be
published in the official journal.
§141. Official journal to be selected by police juries, city and parish councils,
municipal corporations, and school boards
A. The police juries, city and parish councils, municipal corporations, and
school boards in all the parishes, the parish of Orleans excepted, at their first meeting
in June of each year, shall select a newspaper or designate a website as official
journal for their respective parishes, towns, or cities for a term of one year.
* * *
§141.1. Requirement for website when newspaper is the official journal
A. Every official journal which is a newspaper selected pursuant to this Part
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-401 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 146
shall have a website and shall post all official proceedings and public notices that it
publishes on that website and on a collective website in which a majority of the
state's official journals participate.
* * *
§143. Newspaper or designated website selected to be known as official journal;
duties
The newspaper or designated website selected shall be known as the official
journal of the parish, town, city or school board, and it shall publish all minutes,
ordinances, resolutions, budgets and other official proceedings of the police jury,
town or city councils, or the school board.
§143.1. Publications; errors and omissions; billing; retention period
* * *
B.(1) An official journal which is a newspaper that publishes official
proceedings and public notices shall, within thirty days after such a publication,
submit a bill for the publication with a copy of the original published proceeding or
notice and a verified statement that does both of the following:
(a) States the rate charged to the political subdivision for the publication.
(b) Certifies the number and dates of publication.
* * *
§144. Penalty for failure to have proceedings published
A. The official of any municipal corporation, police jury, or school board by
law responsible for the preparing and recording of the official proceedings who,
within twenty days from the date of any meeting at which the official proceedings
were had, wilfully willfully neglects or fails to furnish the official journal with a
copy of the minutes, ordinances, resolutions, budgets, and proceedings for
publication, shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than five
hundred dollars, or be imprisoned for not less than ten days nor more than six
months, or both.
B. The person identified, in accordance with R.S. 43:140(6)(g), as
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-401 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 146
responsible for publishing of the official proceedings of any municipal
corporation, police jury, or school board, who, within twenty days from receipt
of any request to publish official proceedings, willfully neglects or fails to
publish a copy of the minutes, ordinances, resolutions, budgets, and proceedings
on the governing body's website, shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars
nor more than five hundred dollars, or be imprisoned for not less than ten days
nor more than six months, or both.
* * *
§171. Selection of newspaper
* * *
D. Notwithstanding any provision of Subsections A and C of this Section,
a levee, drainage, subdrainage, road, subroad, navigation, and sewerage
districts, or other political subdivisions of state and parishes, may designate a
website as defined in R.S. 43:140(6) as its official journal, in the same manner
and under the same provisions as required by R.S. 43:141, et seq.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.